Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.868

Faculty tenure—Faculty members currently employed granted tenure.

All employees of a community college district, except presidents, who were employed in the community college district at the effective date of chapter 283, Laws of 1969 ex. sess. and who hold or have held a faculty appointment with the community college district or its predecessor school district shall be granted tenure by their appointing authority notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 28B.50.850 through 28B.50.869.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 5 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 44. Formerly RCW 28.85.868.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The various provisions of chapter 283, Laws of 1969 ex. sess. became effective on several different dates. The effective date of the provisions thereof relating to tenure appears to have been midnight August 10, 1969, see preface, Laws of 1969 ex. sess., and see also 1969 ex.s. c 283 ss 54 and 55 (uncodified).

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.